Oklahoma, session 2026, SB471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 46A, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 46A. All economic incentive provisions enacted after


January 1, 2016, the effective date of this act and all economic


incentive provisions reauthorized or extended beyond a provided date


of expiration after the effective date of this act shall include a


measurable goal or goals and, for an incentive claimed as a credit,


a limitation on the duration of the provision to ten (10) or fewer


years. For the purposes of this act, “incentive” shall include


section:


1. “Incentive” means any provision available to be used by


designed to benefit a business entity in the form of:

Req. No. 239 Page 1


a. a credit, exemption, deduction, or rebate pertaining


to a state tax liability of any kind; including a


credit for an employee whose qualification is based on


a specific degree, certification, or state license, or


due to employment by an entity classified under a


specific North American Industry Classification System


code,


b. any grant, loan, or financing program offered by the


state or a state-beneficiary public trust;, or


c. any program for incentive payments from the state; and


2. “Measurable goal” means a statement about the expected long-


term result of an incentive, intended for use as a foundation for


data collection, comparison, and evaluation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-239 QD 1/19/2025 5:37:04 AM

















Req. No. 239 Page 2